pt-PT: Design da parede da colher: Perfurado; Com ranhura; Sólido; Outro
sl-SI: Zasnova stene zajemalke: Perforirana; Ploščate; Trden; Druga
sv: Väggdesign – skopa: Perforerad; Slitsad; Solid; Annat
ja: スクープウォールのデザイン: ミシン目; スロット付き; ソリッド; その他
da: Skes vægdesign: Perforeret; Slidset; Solid; Andet
es: Diseño de la superficie de la cuchara: Perforado; Ranurado; Sólido; Otros
nl: Schepwand-ontwerp: Geperforeerd; Sleuven; Stevig; Overig
it: Design delle pareti della paletta: Perforata; A fessura; Solido; Altro
th: การออกแบบผนังของที่ตัก: แบบเจาะรู; เจาะรู; แผ่นตัน; อื่นๆ
vi: Thiết kế thành muỗng: Đục lỗ; Có lỗ; Lốp rắn; Khác
pl: Typ ścianki czerpaka: Perforowane; Szczelinowe; Pełne; Inne
hr-HR: Dizajn stjenke žlice grabilice: Perforirani; S utorima; Čvrsti; Ostalo
fr: Conception des parois de la pelle à frites: Perforé; Fendu; Solide; Autre
ko: 스쿱 벽면 디자인: 구멍 뚫림; 슬롯형; 솔리드; 기타
en: Scoop wall design: Perforated; Slotted; Solid; Other
cs: Konstrukce stěn naběračky: Perforovaný povrch; Drážkovaný povrch; Plný povrch (bez perforací); Jiné
ro-RO: Designul pereților lingurii: Perforat; Cu fante; Solid; Altele
hu: Gombóc fal kialakítás: Perforált; Hornyolt; Szilárd; Egyéb
zh-CN: 勺子壁面设计: 带孔; 带槽; 实心; 其他
el: Σχεδιασμός τοιχώματος σέσουλας: Διάτρητο; Με σχισμές; Συμπαγές; Άλλο
tr: Kepçe duvarı tasarımı: Perfore; Oluklu; Düz; Diğer
ru: Конструкция стенок совка: Перфорированные; С прорезями; Цельные; Другие
zh-TW: 杓壁設計: 穿孔式; 開槽式; 實心; 其他
lt-LT: Samtelio sienelių tipas: Perforuotas; Su grioveliais; Kietas; Kita
de: Schaufelwanddesign: Perforiert; Geschlitzt; Solide; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Design da parede da concha: Perfurado; Fendido; Maciço; Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn steny naberačky: Perforovaná; Štrbinová; Pevná; Iné
nb: Design på forsyningsskjeens vegger: Perforert; Spaltet; Fast; Annet
bg-BG: Дизайн на стената на лъжичката: Перфорирано; Решетъчно; Плътно; Друго
fi: Kauhan seinämien muotoilu: Rei'itetty; Uritettu; Kiinteä; Muu